North Carolina statutes. Chapter 30. Surviving Spouses.
Part 3. Assigned in Superior Court.

§ 30-27.
Surviving spouse or child may apply to superior court.

In addition to any support otherwise assigned to the surviving spouse or child under this Article, without application to the personal representative, the surviving spouse, or the child through the child’s guardian or next friend may, after the date specified in the general notice to creditors as provided for in G.S. 28A-14-1(a), and within one year after the decedent’s death, apply to the superior court of the county in which administration was granted or the will probated to have a year’s support assigned at an amount other than prescribed in

G.S. 30-15

and

G.S. 30-17

.

History.

1868-9, c. 93, s. 20; Code, s. 2128; Rev., s. 3104; C.S., s. 4121; 1961, c. 749, s. 11; 2011-344, s. 7; 2012-71, s. 2(e).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-344, s. 7, effective January 1, 2012, and applicable to estates of decedents dying on or after that date, rewrote the section to the extent that a detailed comparison is impracticable.

Session Laws 2012-71, s. 2(e), effective June 26, 2012, added “otherwise,” substituted “under this Article” for “as above prescribed,” and added “or next friend.”

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1978 property law, see 57 N.C.L. Rev. 1103 (1979).

§ 30-28.
Nature of proceeding; parties.

The application shall be by petition in a special proceeding before the clerk of superior court. The personal representative of the deceased, if there is one other than the petitioner, all known creditors, and all known heirs of the deceased, if the deceased is intestate, and devisees of the deceased, if the deceased is testate, shall be made parties to the special proceeding. If the personal representative of the deceased is aware of a creditor, heir, or devisee who should have been made a respondent but was not, then the personal representative shall file a motion to add the creditor, heir, or devisee as a necessary party, and the court shall order such other party to appear in the proceeding.

devisee

History.

1868-9, c. 93, s. 21; Code, s. 2129; Rev., s. 3105; C.S., s. 4122; 2011-284, s. 24; 2011-344, s. 7.

§ 30-29.
What petition must show.

In the petition the petitioner shall set forth, besides the facts entitling petitioner to a year’s support and the value of the support claimed, the further facts that the personal estate of which the decedent died possessed exceeded sixty thousand dollars ($60,000) and also whether or not an allowance has been made to petitioner and the nature and value thereof.

History.

1868-9, c. 93, s. 22; Code, s. 2130; Rev., s. 3106; C.S., s. 4123; 1961, c. 749, s. 12; 1981, c. 413, s. 4; 1995, c. 262, s. 7; 2009-183, s. 3; 2011-344, s. 7; 2013-81, s. 2; 2019-243, s. 24.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2009-183, s. 3, effective January 1, 2010, and applicable to estates of individuals dying on or after that date, substituted “twenty thousand dollars ($20,000)” for “ten thousand dollars ($10,000),” and made a gender neutral change.

Session Laws 2011-344, s. 7, effective January 1, 2012, and applicable to estates of decedents dying on or after that date, substituted “petition” for “complaint” in the section catchline; and rewrote the section to the extent that a detailed comparison is impracticable.

Session Laws 2019-243, s. 24, effective November 6, 2019, substituted “sixty thousand dollars ($60,000)” for “thirty thousand dollars ($30,000).”

§ 30-30.
Judgment.

The clerk of superior court shall hear the matter and determine whether the petitioner is entitled to some or all of the relief sought and, if the clerk determines that the petitioner is so entitled, the clerk shall determine the money or other personal property of the estate and assign to the petitioner a sufficiency thereof for petitioner’s support for one year from the decedent’s death. Any deficiency shall be made up from any of the personal property of the deceased, and if the personal property of the estate shall be insufficient for such support, the clerk of superior court shall enter judgment against the personal representative for the amount of such deficiency, to be paid when a sufficiency of such assets shall come into the personal representative’s hands. Any judgment so rendered shall have the same priority over other debts and claims against the estate as an allowance assigned pursuant to

G.S. 30-15

or

G.S. 30-17

.

History.

1868-9, c. 93, s. 23; Code, s. 2131; Rev., s. 3107; C.S., s. 4124; 1961, c. 749, s. 13; 1971, c. 528, s. 26; 2011-344, s. 7; 2012-194, s. 14.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-344, s. 7, effective January 1, 2012, and applicable to estates of decedents dying on or after that date, rewrote the section to the extent that a detailed comparison is impracticable.

Session Laws 2012-194, s. 14, effective July 17, 2012, deleted “and order for commissioners” at the end of the section heading.

§ 30-31.
Amount of allowance.

The clerk of superior court may assign to the petitioner a value sufficient for the support of petitioner according to the estate and condition of the decedent and without regard to the limitations set forth in this Chapter; but the value allowed shall be fixed with due consideration for other persons entitled to allowances for year’s support from the decedent’s estate; and the total value of all allowances shall not in any case exceed the one half of the average annual net income of the deceased for three years next preceding the deceased’s death. Attorneys’ fees and costs awarded the petitioner under

G.S. 6-21

shall be paid as an administrative expense of the estate.

History.

1868-9, c. 93, s. 24; Code, s. 2132; Rev., s. 3108; C.S., s. 4125; 1971, c. 528, s. 27; 2011-344, s. 7; 2012-18, s. 3.10; 2013-91, s. 1(e).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2011-344, s. 7, effective January 1, 2012, and applicable to estates of decedents dying on or after that date, deleted “Duty of commissioners” from the beginning of the section catchline; and rewrote the section to the extent that a detailed comparison is impracticable.

Session Laws 2012-18, s. 3.10, effective June 11, 2012, deleted the former last sentence, which read: “This report shall be returned by the magistrate to the courts.”

Session Laws 2013-91, s. 1(e), effective June 12, 2013, added the last sentence.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1978 property law, see 57 N.C.L. Rev. 1103 (1979).

§ 30-31.1.
Service of judgment and appeal.

The petitioner shall serve the clerk’s judgment on all other parties. The judgment also shall be filed in the estate file of the deceased. Any aggrieved party may appeal the judgment in accordance with

G.S. 1-301.2

.

History.

2011-344, s. 7.

§ 30-31.2.
Execution.

If the clerk’s judgment is not appealed as provided in

G.S. 1-301.2

, execution shall issue to enforce the judgment as in like cases under Article 28 of Chapter 1 of the General Statutes.

History.

2011-344, s. 7.

§ 30-32.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2012-194, s. 40, effective July 17, 2012.

History.

1868-9, c. 93, s. 25; Code, s. 2133; Rev., s. 3109; C.S., s. 4126; 1947, c. 484, s. 1; 2011-284, s. 25; 2011-344, s. 7; repealed by 2012-194, s. 40 effective July 17, 2012.

§ 30-33.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2011-344, s. 7, effective January 1, 2012, and applicable to estates of decedents dying on or after that date.

History.

1868-9, c. 93, s. 26; Code, s. 2134; Rev., s. 3110; C.S., s. 4127; repealed by 2011-344, s. 7, effective January 1, 2012, and applicable to estates of decedents dying on or after that date.